Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are appropriated  to the State Treasurer, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative expenses
related to the Oregon
529 ABLE program .................... $ 1,327,497
(2) Administrative expenses
related to the Oregon
Retirement Savings Board ........ $ 1,149,558
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Treasurer, for the
following purposes:
(1) Administrative expenses of
State Treasury operations ........ $ 75,596,922
(2) Administrative expenses of
the Oregon 529 Savings
Network .................................... $ 6,378,460
SECTION 3.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5541 (SB 5541-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate July 4, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5541 (SB 5541-A) Page 2